Washington statutes.
RCW 7.16.100

Service of writ.

The writ may be served as follows, except where different directions respecting the mode of service thereof are given by the court granting it:

(1) Where it is directed to a person or persons by name or by his or her official title or titles, or to a municipal corporation, it must be served upon each officer or other person to whom it is directed, or upon the corporation, in the same manner as a summons.

(2) Where it is directed to a court, or to the judges of a court, having a clerk appointed pursuant to law, service upon the court or the judges thereof may be made by filing the writ with the clerk.

[ 1895 c 65 s 10; RRS s 1008.]